Utah statutes.
24-1-19.   Crime Reduction Assistance Program.
(1)  There is created the Crime Reduction Assistance Program.
(2)  The program shall fund crime prevention and law enforcement activities
that have the purpose of:
(a)  deterring crime by depriving criminals of the profits and proceeds of
their illegal activities;
(b)  weakening criminal enterprises by removing the instrumentalities of
crime;
(c)  reducing crimes involving substance abuse by supporting the creation,
administration, or operation of drug court programs throughout the state;
(d)  encouraging cooperation between local, state, and multijurisdictional law
enforcement agencies;
(e)  allowing the costs and expenses of law enforcement to be defrayed by the
forfeited proceeds of crime; and
(f)  increasing the equitability and accountability of the use of forfeited
property used to assist law enforcement in reducing and preventing crime.
(3) (a)  When property is forfeited under this chapter and transferred to the
fund, the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice shall make awards of
monies from the fund to state, local, or multijurisdictional law enforcement
agencies or political subdivisions of the state in compliance with this
section and to further the program purposes under Subsection (2).
(b)  In granting the awards, the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice
shall ensure that the amount of each award takes into consideration:
(i)  the demonstrated needs of the agency;
(ii)  the demonstrated ability of the agency to appropriately use the award;
(iii)  the degree to which the agency's need is offset through the agency's
participation in federal equitable sharing or through other federal and state
grant programs; and
(iv)  the agency's cooperation with other state and local agencies and task
forces.
(4)  Agencies or political subdivisions shall apply for program awards by
completing and submitting forms specified by the Commission on Criminal and
Juvenile Justice.
(5)  Applying agencies or political subdivisions shall demonstrate compliance
with all reporting and policy requirements applicable under this chapter and
under Title 63M, Chapter 7, Criminal Justice and Substance Abuse, in order to
qualify as a potential award recipient.
(6)  Recipient law enforcement agencies may only use program award monies
after approval or appropriation by the agency's legislative body, and the
award monies are nonlapsing.
(7)  A recipient law enforcement agency or political subdivision shall use
program awards only for law enforcement or controlled substance law
enforcement purposes as described in Subsection (8), and only as these
purposes are specified by the agency or political subdivision in its
application for the award.
(8)  Permissible law enforcement purposes for which award monies may be used
include:
(a)  controlled substance interdiction and enforcement activities;
(b)  drug court programs;
(c)  activities calculated to enhance future investigations;
(d)  law enforcement training that includes:
(i)  implementation of the Fourth Amendment of the federal constitution and
Utah Constitution Article I, Section 7, and addresses the protection of the
individual's rights of due process;
(ii)  protection of the rights of innocent property holders; and
(iii)  the Tenth Amendment of the federal constitution regarding states'
sovereignty and the states' reserved rights;
(e)  law enforcement or detention facilities;
(f)  law enforcement operations or equipment which are not routine costs or
operational expenses;
(g)  drug, gang, or crime prevention education programs which are sponsored in
whole or in part by the law enforcement agency or its legislative body; and
(h)  matching funds for other state or federal law enforcement grants.
(9)  Law enforcement purposes for which award monies may not be granted or
used include:
(a)  payment of salaries, retirement benefits, or bonuses to any person;
(b)  payment of enforcement expenses not related to law enforcement;
(c)  uses not specified in the agency's award application;
(d)  uses not approved or appropriated by the agency's legislative body;
(e)  payments, transfers, or pass-through funding to entities other than law
enforcement agencies; or
(f)  uses, payments, or expenses that are not within the scope of the agency's
functions.
(10)  For each fiscal year, any state, local, or multijurisdictional agency or
political subdivision that received a program award shall prepare, and file
with the Utah Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice and the state
auditor, a report in a form specified by the Utah Commission on Criminal and
Juvenile Justice.  The report shall include the following regarding each
award:
(a)  the agency's name;
(b)  the amount of the award;
(c)  the date of the award;
(d)  how the award has been used; and
(e)  a statement signed by both the agency's or political subdivision's
executive officer or designee and by the agency's legal counsel, that:
(i)  the agency or political subdivision has complied with all inventory,
policy, and reporting requirements of this chapter;
(ii)  all program awards were used for crime reduction or law enforcement
purposes as specified in the application; and
(iii)  and only upon approval or appropriation by the agency's or political
subdivision's legislative body.
(11)  The Utah Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice shall report in
writing to the legislative Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim
Committee annually regarding the forfeited property transferred to the fund,
awards made by the program, uses of program awards, and any equitable share of
property forfeited by the federal government as reported by agencies pursuant
to Subsection 24-1-15(3).
